Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,179
Overloading front seat or obstructing driver; prohibited.

(1) No person shall drive a motor vehicle when it is so loaded, or when there is in the front seat such a number of persons, exceeding three, as to obstruct the view of the driver to the front or sides of the vehicle or to interfere with the driver's control over the driving mechanism of such vehicle.

(2) No passenger in a vehicle shall ride in such a position as to interfere with the driver's view ahead or to the sides or to interfere with the driver's control over the driving mechanism of such vehicle.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 77;

Laws 1975, LB 252, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-677;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 275.